Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2315.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. Every September 9 shall be designated as Kansas fetal
alcohol syndrome disorders day to:
(a) Promote awareness of prenatal exposure to alcohol;
(b) increase compassion for individuals affected by prenatal exposure
to alcohol; and
(c) ensure healthier communities across Kansas.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.